Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 31. District Attorneys

§ 25-31-1.
Qualifications for office.

The district attorney shall possess all the qualifications of county officers and, in addition thereto, shall be a resident of the district in which he or she seeks election for five (5) years immediately preceding the day of the election, shall be a regular licensed and practicing attorney, and shall have been duly admitted to practice before the Supreme Court of the State of Mississippi for a period of two (2) years.

The residency requirements specified under this section shall apply to elections held from and after January 1, 2020.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3920.3; Laws, 1966, ch. 389, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 17, 1966); Laws, 2019, ch. 433, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 25-31-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1972, ch. 497, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

[Codes, 1942, § 3920.7; Laws, 1970, ch. 349, § 1]

§ 25-31-5.
Legal assistants to district attorney; expenditure of certain federal funds for additional legal assistants and criminal investigators authorized.

The following number of full-time legal assistants are authorized in the following circuit court districts:

First Circuit Court District. . . . .nine (9)

legal assistants.

Second Circuit Court District. . . . .ten (10)

legal assistants.

Third Circuit Court District. . . . .five (5)

legal assistants.

Fourth Circuit Court District. . . . .six (6)

legal assistants.

Fifth Circuit Court District. . . . .five (5)

legal assistants.

Sixth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Seventh Circuit Court District. . . . .eleven (11)

legal assistants.

Eighth Circuit Court District. . . . .three (3)

legal assistants.

Ninth Circuit Court District. . . . .three (3)

legal assistants.

Tenth Circuit Court District. . . . .four (4)

legal assistants.

Eleventh Circuit Court District. . . . .five (5)

legal assistants.

Twelfth Circuit Court District. . . . .five (5)

legal assistants.

Thirteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .four (4)

legal assistants.

Fourteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .five (5)

legal assistants.

Fifteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .six (6)

legal assistants.

Sixteenth Circuit Court District. . . . . .five (5)

legal assistants.

Seventeenth Circuit Court District. . . . .seven (7)

legal assistants.

Eighteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Nineteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .six (6)

legal assistants.

Twentieth Circuit Court District. . . . .six (6)

legal assistants.

Twenty-first Circuit Court District. . . . .three (3)

legal assistants.

Twenty-second Circuit Court District. . . . .three (3)

legal assistants.

In addition to any legal assistants authorized pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the following number of full-time legal assistants are authorized (i) in the following circuit court districts if funds are appropriated by the Legislature to adequately fund the salaries, expenses and fringe benefits of such legal assistants, or (ii) in any of the following circuit court districts in which the board of supervisors of one or more of the counties in a circuit court district adopts a resolution to pay all of the salaries, supplemental pay, expenses and fringe benefits of legal assistants authorized in such district pursuant to this subsection:

First Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Second Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Third Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Fourth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Fifth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Sixth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Seventh Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Eighth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Ninth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Tenth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Eleventh Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Twelfth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Thirteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Fourteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Fifteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Sixteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Seventeenth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Eighteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Nineteenth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Twentieth Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Twenty-first Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

Twenty-second Circuit Court District. . . . .two (2)

legal assistants.

The board of supervisors of any county may pay all or a part of the salary, supplemental pay, expenses and fringe benefits of any district attorney or legal assistant authorized in the circuit court district to which such county belongs pursuant to this section.

The district attorney of any circuit court district may employ additional legal assistants or criminal investigators, or both, without regard to any limitation on the number of legal assistants authorized in this section or criminal investigators authorized by other provisions of law to the extent that the district attorney’s office receives funds from any source. Any source shall include, but is not limited to, office generated funds, funds from a county, a combination of counties, a municipality, a combination of municipalities, federal funds, private grants or foundations, or by means of an Interlocal Cooperative Agreement authorized by Section 17-13-1 which may be expended for those positions in an amount sufficient to pay all of the salary, supplemental pay, expenses and fringe benefits of the positions. Such funds may either be paid out of district attorney accounts, transferred by the district attorney to the Department of Finance and Administration or to one or more of the separate counties comprising the circuit court district, and said funds shall be disbursed to such employees in the same manner as state-funded criminal investigators and full-time legal assistants. The district attorney shall report to the board of supervisors of each county comprising the circuit court district the amount and source of the supplemental salary, expenses and fringe benefits, and the board in each county shall spread the same on its minutes. The district attorney shall also report such information to the Department of Finance and Administration which shall make such information available to the Legislative Budget Office.

The district attorney shall be authorized to assign the duties of a legal assistant regardless of the source of funding for such legal assistants.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3920.5; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 38, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1960, ch. 271, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess. ch. 18; Laws, 1966, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 506; Laws, 1976, ch. 468; Laws, 1977, ch. 453, §§ 2, 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 509, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 492; Laws, 1984, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 58; Laws, 1987, ch. 458; Laws, 1988, ch. 552; Laws, 1993, ch. 597, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 100; Laws, 1996, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 577, § 5; Laws, 1999, ch. 501, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 506, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 561, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 558, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 2014, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 1, eff from and after November 1, 2014.

§ 25-31-6.
Legal assistants to district attorney; qualifications; powers and duties; removal.

Legal assistants to district attorneys shall be regularly licensed and practicing attorneys having been duly admitted to practice before the Supreme Court of the State of Mississippi, and shall have the power and authority, under the direction and supervision of the district attorney, to perform all of the duties required of that office. Said legal assistants may be removed at the discretion of the duly elected and acting district attorney, or for cause by the senior circuit judge of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3920.8, 3920.9; Laws, 1972, ch. 497, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 509, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 1980.

§ 25-31-7.
Repealed by implication [see now § 25-31-8].

§ 25-31-8.
Office operating allowance.

From and after July 1, 2006, in all circuit court districts in this state existing now or hereafter created, the district attorney shall receive from sums appropriated for such purpose from the General Fund or any special fund of the State of Mississippi, an office operating allowance for the necessary expenses of operating the office of the district attorney, including stenographic help, and other items and expenditures necessary and incident to the investigation of criminal cases, the general expenses of the office of the investigation of criminal cases, the general expenses of the office of the district attorney for preparing and/or trying felony cases and all other cases requiring the services of the district attorney, the sum of Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00) for each district, and an additional Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) for each assistant authorized by Section 25-31-5(1). All expenditures made from such office operating allowances shall be upon written requisition of the duly elected district attorney to the State Auditor, as otherwise provided by law. The district attorney may delegate to the board of supervisors of any county in his district the responsibility and authority to employ and set the salary of not more than one (1) employee for the office of such district attorney, such salary to be paid as other expenditures are paid from the funds provided by this section. Such employee shall be deemed to be appointed and employed by the board of supervisors and the salary shall not be deemed to be a pecuniary benefit provided by the district attorney’s office. The district attorney shall be authorized to assign the duties of any employees regardless of the source of funding for such employees.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3920.10; Laws, 1972, ch. 497, § 4; Laws, 1976, ch. 392; Laws, 1977, ch. 453, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 509, § 7, 1979, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 391, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 586, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 443, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 455, § 2; brought forward without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 561, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 25-31-9.
Repealed by implication.

§ 25-31-10.
Criminal investigators.

Any district attorney may appoint a full-time criminal investigator.

The district attorneys of the Third, Fifth, Ninth, Tenth, Eleventh, Twelfth, Thirteenth, Fourteenth, Fifteenth, Sixteenth, Seventeenth and Twentieth Circuit Court Districts may appoint one (1) additional full-time criminal investigator for a total of two (2) full-time criminal investigators.

The district attorneys of the First, Second, Fourth, Seventh and Nineteenth Circuit Court Districts may appoint two (2) additional full-time criminal investigators for a total of three (3) full-time criminal investigators.

No district attorney or assistant district attorney shall accept any private employment, civil or criminal, in any matter investigated by such criminal investigators.

The full and complete compensation for all public duties rendered by said criminal investigators shall be not more than Fifty-nine Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($59,500.00) per annum, to be determined at the discretion of the district attorney based upon the qualifications, education and experience of the criminal investigator, plus necessary travel and other expenses, to be paid in accordance with Section 25-31-8. However, the maximum salary under this subsection for a criminal investigator who has a law degree may be supplemented by the district attorney from other available funds, but not to exceed the maximum salary for a legal assistant to a district attorney.

Any criminal investigator may be designated by the district attorney to attend the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program set forth in Section 45-6-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972. The total expenses associated with attendance by criminal investigators at the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program shall be paid out of the funds of the appropriate district attorney.

The district attorney shall be authorized to assign the duties of criminal investigators regardless of the source of funding for such criminal investigators.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 453, § 4; Laws, 1978, ch. 509, § 8; Laws, 1981, ch. 522, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 522; Laws, 1993, ch. 550, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 590, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 616, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 303, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 581, § 4; Laws, 2003, ch. 563, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 548, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 558, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 455, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 25-31-10.1.
Supplemental salary, expenses and fringe benefits for district attorneys, legal assistants and criminal investigators.

In addition to the salaries, expenses and fringe benefits of district attorneys and legal assistants authorized by Section 25-3-35(5) and (6) and criminal investigators authorized by Section 25-31-10(5), the salary of a district attorney may be supplemented in an amount not to exceed Eight Thousand Three Hundred Dollars ($8,300.00) per year; the salary of a legal assistant may be supplemented in an amount not to exceed Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) per year; and the salary of a criminal investigator may be supplemented in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per year, payable monthly. The supplemental salary, expenses and fringe benefits authorized herein may be paid from office-generated funds, funds from a county, a combination of counties, a municipality, a combination of municipalities, a county and a municipality, a combination of counties and municipalities, federal funds, grants from private foundations, or by means of an Interlocal Cooperative Agreement authorized by Section 17-13-1. The district attorney shall report to the board of supervisors of each county comprising the circuit court district the amount and source of the supplemental salary, expenses and fringe benefits, and the board in each county shall spread the same on its minutes. The district attorney shall also report such information to the Department of Finance and Administration who shall make such information available to the Legislative Budget Office. The supplemental salary, expenses and fringe benefits may either be paid from district attorney accounts, transferred by the district attorney to the Department of Finance and Administration or to one or more of the separate counties comprising the circuit court district, and such funds shall be disbursed to the employees in the same manner as state-funded criminal investigators and full-time legal assistants.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 530, § 1, eff June 10, 2010, (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 25-31-11.
Powers and duties.

It shall be the duty of the district attorney to represent the state in all matters coming before the grand juries of the counties within his district and to appear in the circuit courts and prosecute for the state in his district all criminal prosecutions and all civil cases in which the state or any county within his district may be interested; but if two (2) or more counties are adversely interested, the district attorney shall not represent either. Any district attorney may also institute and prosecute to final judgment or decree any case in the name of the state against any person or corporation for any violation of the Constitution or the laws of this state, in order to enforce any penalties, fines or forfeitures imposed by law in any court of his district having jurisdiction, with like effect as if the suit was instituted by the Attorney General. Any district attorney may also institute and prosecute to final judgment or decree any case in which prosecution was deferred due to a finding that the defendant was incompetent to stand trial if the case is otherwise triable.

The district attorney may transfer any case handled by him to a county prosecuting attorney when charges in such case no longer constitute a felony.

The validity of any judgment or sentence shall not be affected by the division of jurisdiction under this section, and no judgment or sentence may be reversed or modified upon the basis that the case was not processed according to this section.

A county prosecuting attorney or municipal prosecuting attorney may be designated by the district attorney to appear on behalf of the district attorney pursuant to an agreement relating to appearances in certain courts or proceedings in the county of the county prosecuting attorney or in the municipality of the municipal prosecuting attorney. Such agreement shall be filed with the circuit court clerk of any county where such agreement shall be operative. Such agreement shall be binding upon the district attorney and county prosecuting attorney or municipal prosecuting attorney until dissolved by either of them in writing upon five (5) days’ notice.

Where any statute of this state confers a jurisdiction, responsibility, duty, privilege or power upon a county attorney or county prosecuting attorney, either solely, jointly or alternatively with a district attorney, such county prosecuting attorney shall be responsible for the prosecution, handling, appearance, disposition or other duty conferred by such statute. Any such provision shall not be construed to bestow such responsibility, jurisdiction or power upon the district attorney where there is no elected county prosecuting attorney, and any such matter shall be handled pursuant to Section 19-3-49, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The district attorney or his designated assistant, or the county prosecuting attorney or his designated assistant, shall assist the Attorney General in appeals from his district to the Mississippi Supreme Court and in other post judgment proceedings, and shall appear for oral argument before the Supreme Court when directed by the Supreme Court.

The several district attorneys shall submit reports of revenues and expenditures and shall submit budget requests as required for State General Fund agencies. For purposes of budget control, the several offices of district attorney shall be considered General Fund agencies and the budget and accounts of the several offices, including salaries, travel expenses, office expenses and any other expenditures or revenues, shall be consolidated for all districts as far as such consolidation is practical.

All revenue or funds allocated or expended by a district attorney, whether such funds are appropriated from state funds, or whether such funds are received from county funds, grants or otherwise, shall be reported to the Legislative Budget Office.

A district attorney shall be authorized to assign the duties of employees regardless of the source of funding for such employees.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 22, art 3 (4); 1857, ch. 6, art 70; 1871, § 214; 1880, § 256; 1892, § 1555; 1906, § 1661; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1398; 1930, § 4363; 1942, § 3920; Laws, 1978, ch. 509, § 9; Laws, 1979, ch. 490, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 175; Laws, 2009, ch. 455, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2009; Laws, 2019, ch. 468, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 25-31-13.
District attorney to attend deliberations of grand jury.

The district attorney shall attend the deliberations of the grand jury whenever he may be required by the grand jury, and shall give the necessary information as to the law governing each case, in order that the same may be presented in the manner required by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 65, art 11 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art 70; 1871, § 214; 1880, § 256; 1892, § 1556; 1906, § 1663; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1400; 1930, § 4364; 1942, § 3921.

§ 25-31-15.
District attorney to pass on public accounts.

All accounts of a public nature, before they are allowed by the circuit court, shall be presented to the district attorney; and his opinion concerning the validity of the same, and whether the same should be allowed or disallowed, shall be obtained in writing and presented to the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 22, art 3 (4); 1857, ch. 6, art 70; 1880, § 256; 1892, § 1557; 1906, § 1664; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1401; 1930, § 4365; 1942, § 3922.

§ 25-31-17.
District attorney to give opinions and prosecute public debtors.

It shall be the duty of the district attorney, when requested by the county depository or the board of supervisors, or the clerk thereof, to give his opinion in writing upon all cases concerning the revenue or expenses of the county, and with the approval of the Attorney General to institute and prosecute to effect, before the proper court, all persons indebted to the state or any county within his district.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 22, art 3 (4); 1857, ch. 6, art 71; 1880, § 257; 1892, § 1558; 1906, § 1665; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1402; 1930, § 4366; 1942, § 3923.

§ 25-31-19.
To represent state tax and public service commissions.

The several district attorneys, with the Attorney General, are hereby authorized to institute or defend any suits arising out of any act or order of the tax commission or the public service commission affecting the laws and revenues of the state, and are also clothed with such other authority as is conferred upon them at common law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp, § 3488a; 1930, § 3673; 1942, § 3844; Laws, 1918, ch. 238.

§ 25-31-21.
Pro tempore appointment and compensation of appointees.

If, at the time of impaneling the grand jury in any circuit court, the district attorney be absent or unable to perform his duties or, if after impaneling of the grand jury, the district attorney be absent or unable to perform his duties or be disqualified, the court shall forthwith appoint some attorney at law to act for the state in the place of the district attorney during his absence or inability or disqualification, and the person appointed shall have the power to discharge all the duties of the office during the absence or inability or disqualification of the district attorney, and shall receive a reasonable compensation for his services, to be allowed by the court and certified to the auditor, who shall issue his warrant therefor. Such allowance shall be deducted from the salary of the district attorney, and shall not exceed the amount of the salary of the district attorney for the number of days allotted by law for the term of the court at which such appointees shall act.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 65, art 11 (3); 1857, ch. 6, art 72; 1871, § 216; 1880, § 258; 1892, § 1559; 1906, § 1666; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1403; 1930, § 4367; 1942, § 3924; Laws, 1898, ch. 58.

§ 25-31-23.
Duty as to fines.

The district attorney, at each term of the circuit court, shall carefully examine the minutes of the preceding terms and the execution docket, to see that executions have been issued for all fines, penalties, and forfeitures adjudged at such terms, and that the same have been properly proceeded on and returned, and what fines, penalties, and forfeitures have been collected; and he shall, at the close of every term, make out a statement of all fines, forfeitures, and penalties adjudged and made final at such term; and also of all fines, penalties, and forfeitures collected or received by the sheriff or other officer, stating each case and the amount, and shall deliver the same to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county. He shall proceed against the officers and their sureties for any neglect of duty of which they may be guilty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 309; 1880, § 1789; 1892, § 1560; 1906, § 1667; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1404; 1930, § 4368; 1942, § 3925.

§ 25-31-25.
District attorney to institute and prosecute suits to vacate fraudulent conveyances.

When it may be necessary and proper for the enforcement or collection of any judgment or debt in favor of the state, or any officer thereof in his official capacity, or of any county, the district attorney with the approval of the attorney general shall institute and prosecute, in behalf of the creditor, a suit or suits to set aside and annul any conveyance or other device fraudulently made by the debtor, or any one for him, to hinder, delay, or defraud the creditor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1561; 1906, § 1668; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1405; 1930, § 4369; 1942, § 3926.

§ 25-31-27.
Antitrust suits to require consent of Attorney General.

No district attorney of this state, without the consent in writing of the attorney general, shall institute or prosecute any civil suit for a violation of the antitrust statutes of this state; and no court shall take cognizance of any such suit without such written consent of the Attorney General.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4370; 1942, § 3927; Laws, 1922, ch. 274.

§ 25-31-29.
Reports on persons sentenced to state penitentiary.

The district attorneys of the several circuit court districts in the State of Mississippi shall furnish the superintendent of the Mississippi state penitentiary and the probation and parole board, within fifteen days after adjournment of each term of court, a written report on each person sentenced by the court for a term in the state penitentiary, showing therein a summary of facts of the case for which he is serving sentence, pertinent circumstances of his life, the antecedents of the violation of the law because of which he has been committed to the penitentiary, and his prior training and employment as available to the district attorney at the time of conviction, including prior convictions, results of mental examinations, and conditions under which arrest was made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3927.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 391, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 1966).

§ 25-31-31.
Office of criminal records.

In any circuit court district bordering on the Gulf Coast wherein U.S. Highway 90 and U.S. Highway 49 intersect, there is hereby created and established the Office of Criminal Records of such district or districts, the affairs of which office shall be managed and controlled by a custodian to be appointed by the senior circuit judge of the district or districts, said appointment to be approved by the district attorney of said district or districts. Said custodian shall be directly responsible to the district attorney and may be removed only by the unanimous consent of the senior circuit judge and the district attorney, and in case of a controversy between said senior circuit judge and district attorney as to the removal of said custodian, then the circuit clerk of said district or districts shall decide the issue.

It shall be the duty of said custodian to perform the duties of maintaining all records of outstanding capiases issued on indictments returned in the circuit court of said district or districts, and to assist the district attorney in the collections of all fines and forfeitures due, in accordance with the duties imposed upon the district attorney’s office in Section 25-31-23. The custodian shall be an adult resident citizen of said district or districts, and shall in addition to other duties imposed herein be required to assist in the preparation of the grand jury dockets, the record for extradition of criminals throughout the State of Mississippi, the coordination of law enforcement problems by and between the sheriffs’ offices and the various municipalities, constables, military police, and other peace officers of said district or districts, and to assist all said peace officers, under the direction of the duly elected district attorney of said district or districts, and the county attorneys thereof in investigation of criminal cases and the coordination of the work of investigation between local, state, and federal officers.

It shall be the duty of the person so appointed to assist in the orderly transfer under the direction of the district attorney’s office of all criminal records whenever there shall be a change in administration in the sheriffs’ offices so as to effect the continuity of the prosecution on the part of the State of Mississippi, and to continue the pursuit of those persons charged with crimes within the said district or districts who have not been apprehended and returned for prosecution and punishment.

The annual salary of such custodian shall be fixed by a majority of the boards of supervisors of the counties composing such district or districts and shall not exceed the annual salary allowed to criminal investigators in the county, payable monthly from the general fund of each county composing such district or districts in proportion to the amount of criminal business and uniform reciprocal support cases originating in each county. The boards of supervisors may pay such other expenses to effectuate the purposes of this section as they may deem necessary to public justice. Said expenses shall be upon requisition of the district attorney, payable in the discretion of the boards.

It is the purpose and intent of this section to enable the collection of fines and forfeitures, as well as to coordinate the orderly investigation, apprehension, prosecution, sentence, and punishment of those persons charged with crimes within such district or districts.

The records compiled by the office created hereunder shall be the property of the district and shall be transferred by the district attorney to his successor in office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3927.9; Laws, 1968, ch. 381; Laws, 1975, ch. 366; Laws, 1983, ch. 415; Laws, 1992, ch. 404 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).

§ 25-31-33.
Certain counties to contribute toward salaries of district attorneys and legal assistants.

The board of supervisors of any county having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000) according to the federal decennial census of 1970 shall contribute a sum equal to Four Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($4,500.00) per year, payable monthly, to supplement the salary of the district attorney of that county, provided that he serves full time; and shall contribute a sum equal to Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) per year, payable monthly, per full-time legal assistant to supplement the salary of each full-time legal assistant to the district attorney of that county.

The board of supervisors of any Class 1 county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and having two (2) judicial districts shall contribute a sum equal to Four Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($4,500.00) per year, payable monthly, to supplement the salary of the district attorney of that county provided that he serves full time; and shall contribute a sum equal to Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per year, payable monthly, to supplement the salary of each full-time legal assistant to the district attorney of that county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 396 § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).

§ 25-31-35.
District attorneys shall not engage in private practice; exception.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall be unlawful and shall constitute a high misdemeanor for any district attorney to hold himself out to the general public or otherwise as being engaged in the private practice of law, whether or not he anticipates receiving any form of remuneration from his clients or any person seeking his advice. Any district attorney who shall be found guilty of violation of this provision shall be removed from office by the circuit judge of the county where such violation occurred.

Any person not serving as a legal assistant to the district attorney who is appointed by the Governor to serve as district attorney to fill a vacancy occurring in such office until such office shall be filled by a special or regular election as provided by Sections 23-15-193, 23-15-833 and 23-15-843 shall be allowed to engage in the private practice of law while holding the office of district attorney pursuant to such appointment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 453, § 7; Laws, 1983, ch. 322, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 396 § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).

§ 25-31-36.
Right of district attorney to conclude civil cases pending at time of taking office; practice by appointees pending filling of vacancy by election.

Except as otherwise provided herein, no district attorney shall engage in the private practice of law. However, district attorneys may continue to practice for a period of time, not to exceed six (6) months from the date of taking office, in any of the courts so far as to enable them to bring to a conclusion civil cases actually pending in which such district attorneys were employed when they were appointed or elected.

Any person not serving as a legal assistant to the district attorney who is appointed by the Governor to serve as district attorney to fill a vacancy occurring in such office until such office shall be filled by a special or regular election as provided by Sections 23-15-193, 23-15-833 and 23-15-843 shall be allowed to engage in the private practice of law while holding the office of district attorney pursuant to such appointment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 490, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 322, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 396 § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).

§ 25-31-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 396, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).

[Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1978.]

§ 25-31-39.
Abolition of part-time district attorneys and part-time legal assistants; exception.

There shall be no part-time district attorneys or part-time legal assistants to district attorneys; however, any person not serving as a legal assistant to the district attorney who is appointed by the Governor to serve as district attorney to fill a vacancy occurring in such office until such office shall be filled by a special or regular election as provided by Sections 23-15-193, 23-15-833 and 23-15-843 shall be allowed to engage in the private practice of law while holding the office of district attorney pursuant to such appointment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 509, § 10; Laws, 1983, ch. 322, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 396 § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).

§ 25-31-41.
District Attorneys Operation Fund created; source of money; use of funds; funding of district attorneys’ expenses; deposit of user charges and fees authorized by Section 99-19-72(1)(a) and (b) into State General Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund designated as the District Attorneys Operation Fund. The funds shall be administered by the Attorney General. The fund shall consist of monies deposited therein as provided in Section 99-19-72 and monies from any other source designated for deposit into the fund. The Attorney General may also accept monies from any public or private source for deposit into the fund. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned from the investment of monies in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.

Monies in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature and may only be used for the purpose of assisting district attorneys as determined necessary by the Attorney General. Monies in the fund used for the purposes described in this section shall be in addition to other funds available from any other source for such purposes.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of district attorneys shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized by Section 99-19-72(1)(a) and (b) shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined by the State Fiscal Officer, and charges and fees authorized by Section 99-19-72(1)(c) shall be retained by the circuit clerks for expenditures authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 561, § 3; Laws, 1st Ex Sess, 2017, ch. 7, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 25-31-43.
Retention of one service-issued sidearm by district attorney, legal assistant to district attorney or criminal investigator employed by district attorney upon retirement.

Any district attorney, legal assistant to a district attorney or criminal investigator employed by a district attorney who retires under the Public Employees’ Retirement System for superannuation or for reason of disability shall be allowed to retain, as his personal property, one (1) sidearm which was issued under authority of Section 97-37-7. The replacement cost of the sidearm shall come from funds appropriated to the district attorney other than those funds appropriated from State General Funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 535, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.